District of Columbia statutes.
47-3804

Rules.

The Mayor shall, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

Sept. 29, 1988, D.C. Law 7-173, § 7, 35 DCR 5758
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 7-173, the “Supermarket Tax Incentive Amendment Act of 1988”, see Mayor’s Order 89-84, April 24, 1989.
1981 Ed., § 47-3804.